Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.350

Appellate review.

From a final judgment in the superior court, in any such proceeding, appellate review by the supreme court or the court of appeals may be sought as in other actions.

[ 1988 c 202 s 4; 1971 c 81 s 30; 1895 c 65 s 35; RRS s 1033.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.